Washington statutes.
RCW 17.10.030

State noxious weed control board—Members—Terms—Elections—Meetings—Reimbursement for travel expenses.

There is created a state noxious weed control board comprised of nine voting members and four nonvoting members. Four of the voting members shall be elected by the members of the various activated county noxious weed control boards, and shall be residents of a county in which a county noxious weed control board has been activated and a member of said board, and those qualifications shall continue through their term of office. Two of these members shall be elected from the west side of the state, the crest of the Cascades being the dividing line, and two from the east side of the state. The director of agriculture is a voting member of the board. One voting member shall be elected by the directors of the various active weed districts formed under chapter 17.04 or 17.06 RCW. The Washington state association of counties appoints one voting member who shall be a member of a county legislative authority. A statewide association representing county noxious weed coordinators appoints a nonvoting technical advisor. The director shall appoint two voting members to represent the public interest, one from the west side and one from the east side of the state. The director shall also appoint three nonvoting members representing scientific disciplines relating to weed control. The term of office for all members of the board is four years from the date of election or appointment.

The board, by rule, shall establish a position number for each elected position of the board and shall designate which county noxious weed control board members are eligible to vote for each elected position. The elected members serve staggered terms. Elections for the elected members of the board shall be held thirty days prior to the expiration date of their respective terms. Nominations and elections shall be by mail and conducted by the board.

The board shall conduct its first meeting within thirty days after all its members have been elected. The board shall elect from its members a chair and other officers as may be necessary. A majority of the voting members of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business and is necessary for any action taken by the board. The members of the board serve without salary, but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties under this chapter in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 2021 c 217 s 2; 1997 c 353 s 4; 1987 c 438 s 2; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 23; 1969 ex.s. c 113 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.